Connecticut, session 2026, HB05417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 10a-77 of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (a) Subject to the provisions of section 10a-26, the Board of Regents
5 for Higher Education shall fix fees for tuition at the Connecticut State
6 Community College and shall fix fees for such other purposes as the
7 board deems necessary at the college, and may make refunds to the
8 same.
9 (b) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall establish and
10 administer a fund to be known as the Connecticut State Community
11 College Operating Fund. Appropriations from general revenues of the
12 state and, upon request by the board and with an annual review and
13 approval by the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, the
14 amount of the appropriations for fringe benefits and workers'
15 compensation applicable to the Connecticut State Community College
16 pursuant to subsection (a) of section 4-73, shall be transferred from the
17 Comptroller, and all tuition revenue received by the Connecticut State
LCO 1 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
18 Community College in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a)
19 of this section shall be deposited in said fund. Income from student fees
20 or related charges; the proceeds of auxiliary activities and business
21 enterprises, gifts and donations; federal funds and grants for purposes
22 other than research, and all receipts derived from the conduct by the
23 college of their education extension programs and summer school
24 sessions shall be credited to said fund but shall be allocated to the central
25 office and campus operating accounts which shall be established and
26 maintained for the central office and each campus of the Connecticut
27 State Community College. If the Secretary of the Office of Policy and
28 Management disapproves such transfer, the secretary may require the
29 amount of the appropriation for operating expenses to be used for
30 personal services and fringe benefits to be excluded from said fund. The
31 State Treasurer shall review and approve the transfer prior to such
32 request by the board. The board shall establish an equitable policy, in
33 accordance with section 10a-8, for allocation of appropriations from
34 general revenues of the state, fringe benefits transferred from the
35 Comptroller and tuition revenue deposited in the Connecticut State
36 Community College Operating Fund. At the beginning of each quarter
37 of the fiscal year, the board shall allocate and transfer, in accordance
38 with said policy, moneys for expenditure in such campus operating
39 accounts, exclusive of amounts retained for central office operations and
40 reasonable reserves for future distribution. All costs of waiving or
41 remitting tuition pursuant to subsection [(f)] (g) of this section shall be
42 charged to the Connecticut State Community College Operating Fund.
43 Repairs, alterations or additions to facilities supported by operating
44 funds and costing one million dollars or more shall require the approval
45 of the General Assembly, or when the General Assembly is not in
46 session, of the Finance Advisory Committee. Any balance of receipts
47 above expenditures shall remain in said fund, except such sums as may
48 be required for deposit into a debt service fund or the General Fund for
49 further payment by the Treasurer of debt service on general obligation
50 bonds of the state issued for purposes of the regional community-
51 technical colleges, or after July 1, 2023, for the purposes of the
52 Connecticut State Community College.
LCO 2 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
53 (c) Commencing December 1, 1984, and thereafter not later than sixty
54 days after the close of each quarter, the Board of Regents for Higher
55 Education shall submit to the joint standing committee of the General
56 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and
57 the budgets of state agencies, the Office of Higher Education and the
58 Office of Policy and Management a report on the actual expenditures of
59 the Connecticut State Community College Operating Fund.
60 (d) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall waive the
61 payment of tuition at the Connecticut State Community College (1) for
62 any dependent child of a person whom the armed forces of the United
63 States has declared to be missing in action or to have been a prisoner of
64 war while serving in such armed forces after January 1, 1960, which
65 child has been accepted for admission to said college and is a resident
66 of the state at the time such child is accepted for admission to said
67 college, (2) subject to the provisions of [subsection] subsections (e) and
68 (f) of this section, for any veteran [, as defined in section 27-103,] who
69 performed service in time of war, [, as defined in section 27-103, except
70 that for purposes of this subsection, "service in time of war" shall not
71 include time spent in attendance at a military service academy, which
72 veteran] has been accepted for admission to said college and is
73 domiciled in this state at the time such veteran is accepted for admission
74 to said college, or for the child of any such veteran. Said board shall also
75 waive for any such veteran, or for the child of such veteran, the payment
76 of any extension fees under section 10a-26 for educational extension
77 programs, (3) for any resident of the state (A) sixty-two years of age or
78 older, or (B) who is a resident of a nursing home, as defined in section
79 19a-490, and has maintained residency at such nursing home for not less
80 than thirty days, provided, at the end of the regular registration period,
81 there are enrolled in the course a sufficient number of students other
82 than those residents eligible for waivers pursuant to this subdivision to
83 offer the course in which such resident intends to enroll and there is
84 space available in such course after accommodating all such students,
85 (4) for any student attending the Connecticut State Police Academy who
86 is enrolled in a law enforcement program at said academy offered in
LCO 3 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
87 coordination with the Connecticut State Community College which
88 accredits courses taken in such program, (5) for any active member of
89 the Connecticut Army or Air National Guard who (A) has been certified
90 by the Adjutant General or such Adjutant General's designee as a
91 member in good standing of the guard, and (B) is enrolled or accepted
92 for admission to said college on a full-time or part-time basis in an
93 undergraduate degree-granting program. Said board shall also waive
94 for any such member the payment of any extension fees under section
95 10a-26 for educational extension programs, (6) for any dependent child
96 of a (A) police officer, as defined in section 7-294a, or supernumerary or
97 auxiliary police officer, (B) firefighter, as defined in section 7-323j, or
98 member of a volunteer fire company, (C) municipal employee, or (D)
99 state employee, as defined in section 5-154, killed in the line of duty, (7)
100 for any resident of the state who is a dependent child or surviving
101 spouse of a specified terrorist victim who was a resident of this state, (8)
102 for any dependent child of a resident of the state who was killed in a
103 multivehicle crash at or near the intersection of Routes 44 and 10 and
104 Nod Road in Avon on July 29, 2005, and (9) for any resident of the state
105 who is a dependent child or surviving spouse of a person who was
106 killed in action while performing active military duty with the armed
107 forces of the United States on or after September 11, 2001, and who was
108 a resident of this state. If any person who receives a tuition waiver in
109 accordance with the provisions of this subsection also receives
110 educational reimbursement from an employer, such waiver shall be
111 reduced by the amount of such educational reimbursement. Veterans
112 and members of the National Guard described in subdivision (5) of this
113 subsection shall be given the same status as students not receiving
114 tuition waivers in registering for courses at the Connecticut State
115 Community College. [Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-30,
116 as] As used in this subsection and subsection (f) of this section,
117 "domiciled in this state", notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-
118 30, includes domicile for less than one year and "veteran" and "service
119 in time of war" have the same meanings as provided in section 27-103,
120 except "service in time of war" shall not include time spent in attendance
121 at a military service academy.
LCO 4 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
122 (e) (1) If any veteran described in subsection (d) of this section has
123 applied for federal educational assistance under the Post-9/11 Veterans
124 Educational Assistance Act of 2008, the Board of Regents for Higher
125 Education shall waive the payment of tuition and extension fees at the
126 Connecticut State Community College for such veteran in accordance
127 with subdivision (2) of this subsection. If any such veteran certifies to
128 said board that such veteran's application for such federal educational
129 assistance has been denied or withdrawn, said board shall waive the
130 payment of tuition and extension fees in accordance with subsection (d)
131 of this section.
132 (2) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, "veteran tuition benefit"
133 means the portion of federal educational assistance under the Post-9/11
134 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008 to be paid to the
135 Connecticut State Community College on behalf of a veteran that
136 represents payment for tuition and extension fees. Such portion shall be
137 calculated by multiplying (i) the total amount of such federal
138 educational assistance to be paid to said college on behalf of such
139 veteran by (ii) an amount obtained by dividing (I) the sum of the actual
140 tuition and extension fees charged by said college to such veteran by (II)
141 the sum of the actual tuition, extension fees and other fees charged by
142 said college to such veteran.
143 (B) Said board shall waive the payment of tuition and extension fees
144 in excess of the veteran tuition benefit at any of the regional community-
145 technical colleges for such veteran.
146 (f) In accordance with subsection (d) of this section, the Board of
147 Regents for Higher Education shall waive the payment of tuition and
148 extension fees for not more than one child of a veteran, provided (1) such
149 child has been accepted for admission to the Connecticut State
150 Community College, (2) such veteran and child are domiciled in this
151 state at the time such child is accepted for admission to said college, and
152 (3) neither such veteran nor such child has ever received a prior waiver
153 of tuition and extension fees pursuant to this section or section 10a-99,
154 as amended by this act, or 10a-105, as amended by this act. A qualifying
LCO 5 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
155 child of a veteran may receive a waiver pursuant to this subsection on
156 the basis of one parent who is a veteran, provided another child in a
157 family may receive such waiver on the basis of another parent who is a
158 veteran.
159 [(f)] (g) Said board shall set aside from the anticipated tuition revenue
160 from the Connecticut State Community College, an amount not less than
161 that required by said board's tuition policy. Such funds shall be used to
162 provide tuition waivers, tuition remissions, grants for educational
163 expenses and student employment for residents enrolled in the
164 Connecticut State Community College as full or part-time matriculated
165 students in a degree-granting program, or enrolled in a precollege
166 remedial program, who demonstrate substantial financial need. Said
167 board may also set aside from its anticipated tuition revenue an
168 additional amount equal to one per cent of such tuition revenue for
169 financial assistance for students who would not otherwise be eligible for
170 financial assistance but who do have a financial need as determined by
171 the college in accordance with this subsection. In determining such
172 financial need, the college shall exclude the value of equity in the
173 principal residence of the student's parents or legal guardians, or in the
174 student's principal residence if the student is not considered to be a
175 dependent of his parents or legal guardians and shall assess the earnings
176 of a dependent student at the rate of thirty per cent.
177 [(g)] (h) The Connecticut State Community College Operating Fund
178 shall be reimbursed for the total amount [by which] of the tuition and
179 extension fee waivers granted under subsection (d) of this section
180 [exceed five per cent of tuition and extension fee revenue] through an
181 annual state appropriation. The Board of Regents for Higher Education
182 shall request such an appropriation and such appropriation shall be
183 based upon an estimate of tuition and extension fee revenue loss using
184 tuition and extension fee rates in effect for the fiscal year in which such
185 appropriation will apply.
186 [(h)] (i) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall allow any
187 student who is a member of the armed forces called to active duty
LCO 6 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
188 during any semester to enroll in any course for which such student had
189 remitted tuition but which was not completed due to active duty status.
190 Such course reenrollment shall be offered to any qualifying student for
191 a period not exceeding four years after the date of release from active
192 duty without additional tuition, student fee or related charge, except if
193 such student has been fully reimbursed for the tuition, fees and charges
194 for the course that was not completed.
195 [(i)] (j) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall not assess or
196 charge a graduation fee to any student enrolled in the Connecticut State
197 Community College for the purpose of graduating from said college.
198 Sec. 2. Section 10a-99 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
199 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
200 1, 2026):
201 (a) Subject to the provisions of section 10a-26, the Board of Regents
202 for Higher Education shall fix fees for tuition and for such other
203 purposes as the board deems necessary for each state university within
204 the Connecticut State University System, and may make refunds of the
205 same.
206 (b) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall establish and
207 administer a fund to be known as the Connecticut State University
208 System Operating Fund. Appropriations from general revenues of the
209 state and upon request by the Connecticut State University System and
210 with the annual review and approval by the Secretary of the Office of
211 Policy and Management, the amount of the appropriations for fringe
212 benefits pursuant to subsection (a) of section 4-73, shall be transferred
213 from the State Comptroller and all tuition revenue received by the
214 Connecticut State University System in accordance with the provisions
215 of subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited in said fund. Income
216 from student fees or related charges, the proceeds of auxiliary activities
217 and business enterprises, gifts and donations, federal funds and grants,
218 subject to the provisions of sections 10a-98 to 10a-98g, inclusive, and all
219 receipts derived from the conduct by a state university of its education
LCO 7 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
220 extension program and its summer school session shall be credited to
221 said fund but shall be allocated to the central office and institutional
222 operating accounts which shall be established and maintained for the
223 central office and each state university. Any such gifts and donations,
224 federal funds and grants for purposes of research shall be allocated to
225 separate accounts within such central office and institutional operating
226 accounts. If the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
227 disapproves such transfer, the secretary may require the amount of the
228 appropriation for operating expenses to be used for personal services
229 and fringe benefits to be excluded from said fund. The State Treasurer
230 shall review and approve the transfer prior to such request by the
231 university. The board shall establish an equitable policy, in accordance
232 with section 10a-8, for allocation of appropriations from general
233 revenues of the state, fringe benefits transferred from the State
234 Comptroller and tuition revenue deposited in the Connecticut State
235 University System Operating Fund. At the beginning of each quarter of
236 the fiscal year, the board shall allocate and transfer, in accordance with
237 said policy, moneys for expenditure in such institutional operating
238 accounts, exclusive of amounts retained for central office operations and
239 reasonable reserves for future distribution. All costs of waiving or
240 remitting tuition pursuant to subsection [(f)] (g) of this section shall be
241 charged to the Connecticut State University System Operating Fund.
242 Repairs, alterations or additions to facilities supported by the
243 Connecticut State University System Operating Fund and costing one
244 million dollars or more shall require the approval of the General
245 Assembly, or when the General Assembly is not in session, of the
246 Finance Advisory Committee. Any balance of receipts above
247 expenditures shall remain in said fund, except such sums as may be
248 required for deposit into a debt service fund or the General Fund for
249 further payment by the Treasurer of debt service on general obligation
250 bonds of the state issued for purposes of the Connecticut State
251 University System.
252 (c) Commencing December 1, 1984, and thereafter not later than sixty
253 days after the close of each quarter, the Board of Regents for Higher
LCO 8 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
254 Education shall submit, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
255 4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
256 cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
257 agencies, the Office of Higher Education and the Office of Policy and
258 Management a report on the actual expenditures of the Connecticut
259 State University System Operating Fund.
260 (d) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall waive the
261 payment of tuition fees for undergraduate and graduate degree
262 programs at the Connecticut State University System (1) for any
263 dependent child of a person whom the armed forces of the United States
264 has declared to be missing in action or to have been a prisoner of war
265 while serving in such armed forces after January 1, 1960, which child
266 has been accepted for admission to [such] an institution within said
267 system and is a resident of the state at the time such child is accepted for
268 admission to such institution, (2) subject to the provisions of
269 [subsection] subsections (e) and (f) of this section, for any veteran [, as
270 defined in section 27-103,] who performed service in time of war, [as
271 defined in section 27-103, except that for purposes of this subsection,
272 "service in time of war" shall not include time spent in attendance at a
273 military service academy, which veteran] has been accepted for
274 admission to such institution and is domiciled in this state at the time
275 such veteran is accepted for admission to such institution, or for the
276 child of any such veteran. Said board shall also waive for any such
277 veteran, or for the child of such veteran, the payment of any extension
278 fees under section 10a-26 for educational extension programs, (3) for any
279 resident of the state sixty-two years of age or older who has been
280 accepted for admission to such institution, provided (A) such resident
281 is enrolled in a degree-granting program, or (B) at the end of the regular
282 registration period, there are enrolled in the course a sufficient number
283 of students other than those residents eligible for waivers pursuant to
284 this subdivision to offer the course in which such resident intends to
285 enroll and there is space available in such course after accommodating
286 all such students, (4) for any student attending the Connecticut Police
287 Academy who is enrolled in a law enforcement program at said
LCO 9 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
288 academy offered in coordination with the university which accredits
289 courses taken in such program, (5) for any active member of the
290 Connecticut Army or Air National Guard who (A) has been certified by
291 the Adjutant General or such Adjutant General's designee as a member
292 in good standing of the guard, and (B) is enrolled or accepted for
293 admission to such institution on a full-time or part-time basis in an
294 undergraduate or graduate degree-granting program. Said board shall
295 also waive for any such member the payment of any extension fees
296 under section 10a-26 for educational extension programs, (6) for any
297 dependent child of a (A) police officer, as defined in section 7-294a, or
298 supernumerary or auxiliary police officer, (B) firefighter, as defined in
299 section 7-323j, or member of a volunteer fire company, (C) municipal
300 employee, or (D) state employee, as defined in section 5-154, killed in
301 the line of duty, (7) for any resident of this state who is a dependent
302 child or surviving spouse of a specified terrorist victim who was a
303 resident of the state, (8) for any dependent child of a resident of the state
304 who was killed in a multivehicle crash at or near the intersection of
305 Routes 44 and 10 and Nod Road in Avon on July 29, 2005, and (9) for
306 any resident of the state who is a dependent child or surviving spouse
307 of a person who was killed in action while performing active military
308 duty with the armed forces of the United States on or after September
309 11, 2001, and who was a resident of this state. If any person who receives
310 a tuition waiver in accordance with the provisions of this subsection also
311 receives educational reimbursement from an employer, such waiver
312 shall be reduced by the amount of such educational reimbursement.
313 Veterans and members of the National Guard described in subdivision
314 (5) of this subsection shall be given the same status as students not
315 receiving tuition waivers in registering for courses at Connecticut state
316 universities. [Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-30, as] As
317 used in this subsection and subsection (f) of this section, "domiciled in
318 this state", notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-30, includes
319 domicile for less than one year and "veteran" and "service in time of war"
320 have the same meanings as provided in section 27-103, except "service
321 in time of war" shall not include time spent in attendance at a military
322 service academy.
LCO 10 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
323 (e) (1) If any veteran described in subsection (d) of this section has
324 applied for federal educational assistance under the Post-9/11 Veterans
325 Educational Assistance Act of 2008, the Board of Regents for Higher
326 Education shall waive the payment of tuition and extension fees at the
327 Connecticut State University System for such veteran in accordance
328 with subdivision (2) of this subsection. If any such veteran certifies to
329 said board that such veteran's application for such federal educational
330 assistance has been denied or withdrawn, said board shall waive the
331 payment of tuition and extension fees in accordance with subsection (d)
332 of this section.
333 (2) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, "veteran tuition benefit"
334 means the portion of federal educational assistance under the Post-9/11
335 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008 to be paid to the
336 Connecticut State University System on behalf of a veteran that
337 represents payment for tuition and extension fees. Such portion shall be
338 calculated by multiplying (i) the total amount of such federal
339 educational assistance to be paid to the Connecticut State University
340 System on behalf of such veteran by (ii) an amount obtained by dividing
341 (I) the sum of the actual tuition and extension fees charged by the
342 Connecticut State University System to such veteran by (II) the sum of
343 the actual tuition, extension fees and other fees charged by the
344 Connecticut State University System to such veteran.
345 (B) Said board shall waive the payment of tuition and extension fees
346 in excess of the veteran tuition benefit at the Connecticut State
347 University System for such veteran.
348 (f) In accordance with subsection (d) of this section, the Board of
349 Regents for Higher Education shall waive the payment of tuition and
350 extension fees for not more than one child of a veteran, provided (1) such
351 child has been accepted for admission to an institution within the
352 Connecticut State University System, (2) such veteran and child are
353 domiciled in this state at the time such child is accepted for admission
354 to such institution, and (3) neither such veteran nor such child has ever
355 received a prior waiver of tuition and extension fees pursuant to this
LCO 11 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
356 section or section 10a-77, as amended by this act, or 10a-105, as amended
357 by this act. A qualifying child of a veteran may receive a waiver
358 pursuant to this subsection on the basis of one parent who is a veteran,
359 provided another child in a family may receive such waiver on the basis
360 of another parent who is a veteran.
361 [(f)] (g) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall set aside
362 from its anticipated tuition revenue, an amount not less than that
363 required by the tuition policy established under subdivision (3) of
364 subsection (a) of section 10a-6. Such funds shall be used to provide
365 tuition waivers, tuition remissions, grants for educational expenses and
366 student employment for any undergraduate or graduate student who is
367 enrolled as a full or part-time matriculated student in a degree-granting
368 program, or enrolled in a precollege remedial program, and who
369 demonstrates substantial financial need. Said board may also set aside
370 from its anticipated tuition revenue an additional amount equal to one
371 per cent of such tuition revenue for financial assistance for students who
372 would not otherwise be eligible for financial assistance but who do have
373 a financial need as determined by the university in accordance with this
374 subsection. In determining such financial need, the university shall
375 exclude the value of equity in the principal residence of the student's
376 parents or legal guardians, or in the student's principal residence if the
377 student is not considered to be a dependent of his parents or legal
378 guardians and shall assess the earnings of a dependent student at the
379 rate of thirty per cent.
380 [(g)] (h) The Connecticut State University System Operating Fund
381 shall be reimbursed for the total amount [by which] of the tuition and
382 extension fee waivers granted under subsection (d) of this section
383 [exceed two and one-half per cent of tuition and extension fee revenue]
384 through an annual state appropriation. The Board of Regents for Higher
385 Education shall request such an appropriation and such appropriation
386 shall be based upon an estimate of tuition and extension fee revenue loss
387 using tuition and extension fee rates in effect for the fiscal year in which
388 such appropriation will apply.
LCO 12 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
389 [(h)] (i) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall allow any
390 student who is a member of the armed forces called to active duty
391 during any semester to enroll in any course for which such student had
392 remitted tuition but which was not completed due to active duty status.
393 Such course reenrollment shall be offered to any qualifying student for
394 a period not exceeding four years after the date of release from active
395 duty without additional tuition, student fee or related charge, except if
396 such student has been fully reimbursed for the tuition, fees and charges
397 for the course that was not completed.
398 [(i)] (j) The Board of Regents for Higher Education shall not assess or
399 charge a graduation fee to any student enrolled in the Connecticut State
400 University System for the purpose of graduating from a state university
401 within such system.
402 Sec. 3. Section 10a-105 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
403 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
404 1, 2026):
405 (a) Subject to the provisions of sections 10a-8 and 10a-26, the Board of
406 Trustees of The University of Connecticut shall fix fees for tuition and
407 shall fix fees for such other purposes as the board deems necessary at
408 The University of Connecticut, and may make refunds of the same.
409 (b) The Board of Trustees of The University of Connecticut shall
410 establish and administer a fund to be known as The University of
411 Connecticut Operating Fund, and in addition, may establish a Special
412 External Gift Fund, and an endowment fund, as defined in section 10a-
413 109c, and such other funds as may be established pursuant to
414 subdivision (13) of subsection (a) of section 10a-109d. Appropriations
415 from general revenues of the state and, upon request by the university
416 and with an annual review and approval by the Secretary of the Office
417 of Policy and Management, the amount of the appropriations for fringe
418 benefits and workers' compensation applicable to the university
419 pursuant to subsection (a) of section 4-73, shall be transferred from the
420 Comptroller, and all tuition revenue received by the university in
LCO 13 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
421 accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, income
422 from student fees or related charges, the proceeds of auxiliary activities
423 and business enterprises, gifts and donations, federal funds and grants
424 for purposes other than research and all receipts derived from the
425 conduct by The University of Connecticut of its education extension
426 program and its summer school session, except funds received by The
427 University of Connecticut Health Center, shall be deposited in said
428 operating fund. If the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management
429 disapproves such transfer, he may require the amount of the
430 appropriation for operating expenses to be used for personal services
431 and fringe benefits to be excluded from said fund. The State Treasurer
432 shall review and approve the transfer prior to such request by the
433 university. All costs of waiving or remitting tuition pursuant to
434 subsection [(g)] (h) of this section, except the cost of waiving or remitting
435 tuition for students enrolled in the schools of medicine or dental
436 medicine, shall be charged to said fund. Repairs, alterations or additions
437 to facilities supported by said fund costing one million dollars or more
438 shall require the approval of the General Assembly, or when the General
439 Assembly is not in session, of the Finance Advisory Committee. Any
440 balance of receipts above expenditures shall remain in said fund, except
441 such sums as may be required for deposit into a debt service fund or the
442 General Fund for further payment by the Treasurer of debt service on
443 general obligation bonds of the state issued for purposes of The
444 University of Connecticut.
445 (c) The Board of Trustees of The University of Connecticut shall
446 establish and administer a fund to be known as The University of
447 Connecticut Health Center Operating Fund. Appropriations from
448 general revenues of the state except the amount of the appropriation for
449 operating expenses to be used for personal services and the
450 appropriations for fringe benefits pursuant to subsection (a) of section
451 4-73, all tuition revenue received by the health center in accordance with
452 the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, income from student fees
453 or related charges, proceeds from auxiliary and business enterprises,
454 gifts and donations, federal funds and grants for purposes other than
LCO 14 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
455 research and other income relative to these activities shall be deposited
456 in said fund. All costs of waiving or remitting tuition pursuant to
457 subsection [(g)] (h) of this section for students enrolled in the schools of
458 medicine or dental medicine shall be charged to said fund. Repairs,
459 alterations or additions to facilities supported by said fund costing one
460 million dollars or more shall require the approval of the General
461 Assembly, or when the General Assembly is not in session, of the
462 Finance Advisory Committee. Any balance of receipts above
463 expenditures shall remain in said fund, except such sums as may be
464 required for deposit into a debt service fund or the General Fund for
465 further payment by the Treasurer of debt service on general obligation
466 bonds of the state issued for purposes of The University of Connecticut
467 Health Center.
468 (d) Commencing December 1, 1981, and thereafter not later than sixty
469 days after the close of each quarter, the board of trustees shall submit to
470 the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
471 cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets of state
472 agencies, the Office of Higher Education and the Office of Policy and
473 Management a report on the actual expenditures of The University of
474 Connecticut Operating Fund and The University of Connecticut Health
475 Center Operating Fund containing such relevant information as the
476 Office of Policy and Management may require in the form prescribed by
477 the board of regents in accordance with subsection (a) of section 10a-8.
478 (e) Said board of trustees shall waive the payment of tuition fees for
479 any undergraduate or graduate degree program at The University of
480 Connecticut (1) for any dependent child of a person whom the armed
481 forces of the United States has declared to be missing in action or to have
482 been a prisoner of war while serving in such armed forces after January
483 1, 1960, which child has been accepted for admission to The University
484 of Connecticut and is a resident of the state at the time such child is
485 accepted for admission to said institution, (2) subject to the provisions
486 of [subsection] subsections (f) and (g) of this section, for any veteran [,
487 as defined in section 27-103,] who performed service in time of war, [as
488 defined in section 27-103, except that for purposes of this subsection,
LCO 15 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
489 "service in time of war" shall not include time spent in attendance at a
490 military service academy, which veteran] has been accepted for
491 admission to said institution and is domiciled in this state at the time
492 such veteran is accepted for admission to said institution, or for the child
493 of any such veteran. Said board shall also waive for any such veteran,
494 or for the child of such veteran, the payment of any extension fees under
495 section 10a-26 for educational extension programs, (3) for any resident
496 of the state sixty-two years of age or older who has been accepted for
497 admission to said institution, provided (A) such resident is enrolled in
498 a degree-granting program, or (B) at the end of the regular registration
499 period, there are enrolled in the course a sufficient number of students
500 other than those residents eligible for waivers pursuant to this
501 subdivision to offer the course in which such resident intends to enroll
502 and there is space available in such course after accommodating all such
503 students, (4) for any active member of the Connecticut Army or Air
504 National Guard who (A) has been certified by the Adjutant General or
505 such Adjutant General's designee as a member in good standing of the
506 guard, and (B) is enrolled or accepted for admission to said institution
507 on a full-time or part-time basis in an undergraduate or graduate
508 degree-granting program. Said board shall also waive for any such
509 member the payment of any extension fees under section 10a-26 for
510 educational extension programs, (5) for any dependent child of a (A)
511 police officer, as defined in section 7-294a, or supernumerary or
512 auxiliary police officer, (B) firefighter, as defined in section 7-323j, or
513 member of a volunteer fire company, (C) municipal employee, or (D)
514 state employee, as defined in section 5-154, killed in the line of duty, (6)
515 for any resident of the state who is the dependent child or surviving
516 spouse of a specified terrorist victim who was a resident of the state, (7)
517 for any dependent child of a resident of the state who was killed in a
518 multivehicle crash at or near the intersection of Routes 44 and 10 and
519 Nod Road in Avon on July 29, 2005, and (8) for any resident of the state
520 who is a dependent child or surviving spouse of a person who was
521 killed in action while performing active military duty with the armed
522 forces of the United States on or after September 11, 2001, and who was
523 a resident of this state. If any person who receives a tuition waiver in
LCO 16 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
524 accordance with the provisions of this subsection also receives
525 educational reimbursement from an employer, such waiver shall be
526 reduced by the amount of such educational reimbursement. Veterans
527 and members of the National Guard described in subdivision (4) of this
528 subsection shall be given the same status as students not receiving
529 tuition waivers in registering for courses at The University of
530 Connecticut. [Notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-30, as] As
531 used in this subsection and subsection (g) of this section, "domiciled in
532 this state", notwithstanding the provisions of section 10a-30, includes
533 domicile for less than one year and "veteran" and "service in time of war"
534 have the same meanings as provided in section 27-103, except "service
535 in time of war" shall not include time spent in attendance at a military
536 service academy.
537 (f) (1) If any veteran described in subsection (e) of this section has
538 applied for federal educational assistance under the Post-9/11 Veterans
539 Educational Assistance Act of 2008, the board of trustees shall waive the
540 payment of tuition and extension fees at The University of Connecticut
541 for such veteran in accordance with subdivision (2) of this subsection. If
542 any such veteran certifies to said board that such veteran's application
543 for such federal educational assistance has been denied or withdrawn,
544 said board of trustees shall waive the payment of tuition and extension
545 fees in accordance with subsection [(d)] (e) of this section.
546 (2) (A) For purposes of this subdivision, "veteran tuition benefit"
547 means the portion of federal educational assistance under the Post-9/11
548 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008 to be paid to The
549 University of Connecticut on behalf of a veteran that represents
550 payment for tuition and extension fees. Such portion shall be calculated
551 by multiplying (i) the total amount of such federal educational
552 assistance to be paid to The University of Connecticut on behalf of such
553 veteran by (ii) an amount obtained by dividing (I) the sum of the actual
554 tuition and extension fees charged by The University of Connecticut to
555 such veteran by (II) the sum of the actual tuition, extension fees and
556 other fees charged by The University of Connecticut to such veteran.
LCO 17 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
557 (B) Said board of trustees shall waive the payment of tuition and
558 extension fees in excess of the veteran tuition benefit at The University
559 of Connecticut for such veteran.
560 (g) In accordance with subsection (e) of this section, the Board of
561 Trustees of The University of Connecticut shall waive the payment of
562 tuition and extension fees for not more than one child of a veteran,
563 provided (1) such child has been accepted for admission to The
564 University of Connecticut, (2) such veteran and child are domiciled in
565 this state at the time such child is accepted for admission to said
566 university, and (3) neither such veteran nor such child has ever received
567 a prior waiver of tuition and extension fees pursuant to this section or
568 section 10a-77, as amended by this act, or 10a-99, as amended by this act.
569 A qualifying child of a veteran may receive a waiver pursuant to this
570 subsection on the basis of one parent who is a veteran, provided another
571 child in a family may receive such waiver on the basis of another parent
572 who is a veteran.
573 [(g)] (h) Said board of trustees shall set aside from its anticipated
574 tuition revenue, an amount not less than that required by the board of
575 governors' tuition policy established under subdivision (3) of subsection
576 (a) of section 10a-6. Such funds shall be used to provide tuition waivers,
577 tuition remissions, grants for educational expenses and student
578 employment for any undergraduate, graduate or professional student
579 who is enrolled as a full or part-time matriculated student in a degree-
580 granting program, or enrolled in a precollege remedial program, and
581 who demonstrates substantial financial need. Said board may also set
582 aside from its anticipated tuition revenue an additional amount equal to
583 one per cent of such tuition revenue for financial assistance for students
584 who would not otherwise be eligible for financial assistance but who do
585 have a financial need as determined by the university in accordance
586 with this subsection. In determining such financial need, the university
587 shall exclude the value of equity in the principal residence of the
588 student's parents or legal guardians, or in the student's principal
589 residence if the student is not considered to be a dependent of his
590 parents or legal guardians and shall assess the earnings of a dependent
LCO 18 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
591 student at the rate of thirty per cent.
592 [(h)] (i) The University of Connecticut Operating Fund shall be
593 reimbursed for the total amount [by which] of tuition and extension fee
594 waivers granted under subsection (e) of this section [exceed two and
595 one-half per cent of tuition and extension fee revenue] through an
596 annual state appropriation. The board of trustees shall request such an
597 appropriation and such appropriation shall be based upon an estimate
598 of tuition and extension fee revenue loss using tuition and extension fee
599 rates in effect for the fiscal year in which such appropriation will apply.
600 [(i)] (j) Said board of trustees shall grant remission or waiver of tuition
601 for graduate assistants at the university. Assistantship payments to
602 graduate assistants shall not be considered salaries and wages under the
603 provisions of section 3-119, and shall be paid according to a schedule
604 prescribed by the university and approved by the State Comptroller.
605 [(j)] (k) Said board of trustees may provide health care coverage for
606 graduate assistants, postdoctoral trainees, graduate fellows and
607 graduate student interns identified in subdivision (8) of section 3-123aaa
608 by enrolling such individuals in a partnership plan as defined in section
609 3-123aaa. All premiums and expenses resulting from the participation
610 of such individuals in the partnership plan shall be paid by the
611 university. No such premiums or expenses shall be charged to the
612 General Fund.
613 [(k)] (l) Said board of trustees shall allow any student who is a
614 member of the armed forces called to active duty during any semester
615 to enroll in any course for which such student had remitted tuition but
616 which was not completed due to active duty status. Such course
617 reenrollment shall be offered to any qualifying student for a period not
618 exceeding four years after the date of release from active duty without
619 additional tuition, student fee or related charge, except if such student
620 has been fully reimbursed for the tuition, fees and charges for the course
621 that was not completed.
622 [(l)] (m) The Board of Trustees of The University of Connecticut shall
LCO 19 of 20

Substitute Bill No. 5417
623 not assess or charge a graduation fee to any student enrolled in The
624 University of Connecticut for the purpose of graduating from such
625 university.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10a-77
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 10a-99
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10a-105
HED Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 20 of 20